Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.235

Selling product, article, or feed containing noxious weed seeds or toxic weeds—Penalty—Rules—Inspections—Fees.

(1) The director of agriculture shall adopt, with the advice of the state noxious weed control board, rules designating noxious weed seeds which shall be controlled in products, screenings, or articles to prevent the spread of noxious weeds. The rules shall identify the products, screenings, and articles in which the seeds must be controlled and the maximum amount of the seed to be permitted in the product, screenings, or article to avoid a hazard of spreading the noxious weed by seed from the product, screenings, or article. The director shall also adopt, with the advice of the state board, rules designating toxic weeds which shall be controlled in feed stuffs and screenings to prevent injury to the animal that consumes the feed. The rules shall identify the feed stuffs and screenings in which the toxic weeds must be controlled and the maximum amount of the toxic weed to be permitted in the feed. Rules developed under this section shall identify ways that products, screenings, articles, or feed stuffs containing noxious weed seeds or toxic weeds can be made available for beneficial uses.

(2) Any person who knowingly or negligently sells or otherwise distributes a product, article, screenings, or feed stuff designated by rule containing noxious weed seeds or toxic weeds designated for control by rule and in an amount greater than the amount established by the director for the seed or weed by rule is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(3) The department of agriculture shall, upon request of the buyer, county weed board, or weed district, inspect products, screenings, articles, or feed stuffs designated by rule and charge fees, in accordance with chapter 22.09 RCW, to determine the presence of designated noxious weed seeds or toxic weeds.

[ 2021 c 217 s 11; 1997 c 353 s 26; 1987 c 438 s 30; 1979 c 118 s 4.]